cs: Konfigurace hlavového složení jízdního kola: ACR (interní vedení); S nastavením úhlu; Externí misky (EC); Integrované (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Závitové (ISO); ZeroStack / semiintegrované (ZS); Jiné
hu: Kerékpáros fejhallgató konfigurációja: ACR (belső kábelvezetés); Állítható dőlésszögű; Külső csészés (EC); Integrált (IS); Kombinált (Mix & Match); Press Fit (PF); Menetes (ISO); ZeroStack / félintegrált (ZS); Egyéb
ro-RO: Configurația căștilor pentru bicicletă: ACR (Rutare internă); Reglabil în unghi; Cuvetă externă (EC); Integrat (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Cu filet (ISO); ZeroStack / Semi-integrat (ZS); Altele
zh-TW: 自行車車頭碗配置: ACR (內走線); 角度調整; 外露式 (EC); 隱藏式 (IS); 混搭; 壓入式 (PF); 鎖牙式 (ISO); 半隱藏式 (ZS); 其他
pt-BR: Configuração da caixa de direção da bicicleta: ACR (Roteamento interno); Ajuste de ângulo; Bacia externa (EC); Integrada (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Com rosca (ISO); ZeroStack/Semi-integrada (ZS); Outro
tr: Bisiklet furş takımı yapılandırması: ACR (Dahili Yönlendirme); Açı Ayarlı; Dıştan Yataklı (EC); Entegre (IS); Karma (Mix & Match); Press Fit (PF); Dişli (ISO); ZeroStack / Yarı Entegre (ZS); Diğer
lt-LT: Dviračio vairo galvutės konfigūracija: ACR (vidinis laidų pravedimas); Reguliuojamo kampo; Išorinis (EC); Integruotas (IS); Mišrus („Mix & Match“); Įpresuojamas (PF); Srieginis (ISO); „ZeroStack“ / pusiau integruotas (ZS); Kita
es: Configuración de la dirección de la bicicleta: ACR (enrutamiento interno); Ajuste de ángulo; Cazoleta externa (EC); Integrado (IS); Combinado; Ajuste a presión (PF); Roscado (ISO); ZeroStack/semiintegrado (ZS); Otro
fi: Polkupyörän ohjainlaakerin kokoonpano: ACR (sisäinen kaapelivienti); Kulman säätö; Ulkoiset laakerikupit (EC); Integroitu (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Kierteellinen (ISO); ZeroStack / puoli-integroitu (ZS); Muu
en: Bicycle headset configuration: ACR (Internal Routing); Angle Adjust; External Cup (EC); Integrated (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Threaded (ISO); ZeroStack / Semi-Integrated (ZS); Other
th: รูปแบบโครงสร้างของถ้วยคอจักรยาน: ACR (ซ่อนสาย); ปรับมุมได้; ถ้วยคอแบบลอย (EC); ซ่อนใน (IS); มิกซ์แอนด์แมตช์; เพรสฟิต (PF); แบบเกลียว (ISO); ZeroStack / กึ่งซ่อนใน (ZS); อื่นๆ
de: Konfiguration des Fahrradsteuersatzes: ACR (Interne Kabelführung); Winkeleinstellung; Externe Lagerschalen (EC); Integriert (IS); Mix & Match; Press-Fit (PF); Mit Gewinde (ISO); ZeroStack / Halbintegriert (ZS); Sonstige
bg-BG: Конфигурация на кормилната система на велосипеда: ACR (вътрешно окабеляване); С регулиране на ъгъла; Външни чашки (EC); Интегрирани чашки (IS); Комбинирани; Пресфит (PF); На резба (ISO); ZeroStack / Полуинтегрирани (ZS); Други
vi: Cấu hình bộ chén cổ xe đạp: ACR (Đi dây âm); Điều chỉnh góc; Chén cổ ngoài (EC); Tích hợp (IS); Phối hợp; Ép chặt (PF); Có ren (ISO); Chìm / bán tích hợp (ZS); Khác
pt-PT: Configuração da direção de bicicleta: ACR (encaminhamento interno); Ajuste de ângulo; Copo externo (EC); Integrada (IS); Misturar e combinar; Press fit (PF); Roscada (ISO); ZeroStack/semi-integrada (ZS); Outros
da: Konfiguration af cyklens headset: ACR (indvendig kabelføring); Vinkeljustering; Ekstern skål (EC); Integreret (IS); Mix & match; Press Fit (PF); Med gevind (ISO); ZeroStack / semi-integreret (ZS); Andet
el: Διαμόρφωση ακουστικών ποδηλάτου: ACR (Εσωτερική δρομολόγηση); Ρύθμιση γωνίας; Εξωτερικό ποτήρι (EC); Ενσωματωμένο (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Με σπείρωμα (ISO); ZeroStack / Ημι-ενσωματωμένο (ZS); Άλλο
zh-CN: 自行车碗组配置: ACR（内走线）; 角度调节; 外置碗组 (EC); 一体式 (IS); 混搭; 压入式 (PF); 螺纹式 (ISO); 隐藏式/半隐藏式 (ZS); 其他
fr: Configuration du jeu de direction de vélo: ACR (passage interne); Angle ajustable; Cuvette externe (EC); Intégré (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Fileté (ISO); ZeroStack/semi-intégré (ZS); Autre
nl: Fietsstuur configuratie: ACR (interne kabelgeleiding); Hoekverstelling; External Cup (EC); Geïntegreerd (IS); Mix & match; Press Fit (PF); Met schroefdraad (ISO); ZeroStack / Semi-geïntegreerd (ZS); Anders
sk-SK: Konfigurácia hlavového zloženia bicykla: ACR (interné vedenie); S nastavením uhla; Externé misky (EC); Integrované (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Závitové (ISO); ZeroStack / polointegrované (ZS); Iné
pl: Konfiguracja sterów rowerowych: ACR (wewnętrzne prowadzenie linek); Z regulacją kąta; Z zewnętrznymi miskami (EC); Zintegrowane (IS); Mieszane (Mix & Match); Wciskane (PF); Gwintowane (ISO); ZeroStack / półzintegrowane (ZS); Inne
ko: 자전거 헤드셋 구성: ACR(인터널 라우팅); 각도 조절; 익스터널 컵(EC); 통합형(IS); 믹스 앤 매치; 프레스핏(PF); 스레드형(ISO); 제로스택/세미 통합형(ZS); 기타
it: Configurazione della serie sterzo per bicicletta: ACR (passaggio cavi interno); Angolo regolabile; Calotta esterna (EC); Integrata (IS); Mix & Match; Press Fit (PF); Filettata (ISO); ZeroStack/Semi-integrata (ZS); Altro
sl-SI: Konfiguracija kolesarskih slušalk: ACR (notranja napeljava); Nastavitev kota; Zunanja čašica (EC); Integrirano (IS); Kombinirano; Press Fit (PF); Z navojem (ISO); ZeroStack/polintegrirano (ZS); Drugo
hr-HR: Konfiguracija ležaja upravljača bicikla: ACR (unutarnje provođenje); Prilagodljivi kut; Vanjska čašica (EC); Integrirani (IS); Kombinirano; Press Fit (PF); S navojem (ISO); ZeroStack / poluintegrirani (ZS); Ostalo
nb: Konfigurasjon av sykkelstyrehodesett: ACR (intern kabling); Vinkeljustering; Utvendig kopp (EC); Integrert (IS); Miks og match; Press Fit (PF); Gjenget (ISO); ZeroStack / semi-integrert (ZS); Annet
sv: Konfiguration av cykelstyrlager: ACR (intern kabeldragning); Justerbar vinkel; Extern lagerkopp (EC); Integrerat (IS); Mix & match; Press-fit (PF); Gängat (ISO); ZeroStack/semi-integrerat (ZS); Övrigt
ja: 自転車用ヘッドセットの構造: ACR (インターナルルーティング); アングルアジャスト; エクスターナルカップ (EC); インテグレーテッド (IS); ミックス & マッチ; プレスフィット (PF); スレッド (ISO); ゼロスタック / セミインテグレーテッド (ZS); その他
ru: Конфигурация рулевой колонки велосипеда: ACR (внутренняя проводка); С регулировкой угла; Внешние чашки (EC); Интегрированная (IS); Комбинированная (Mix & Match); Пресс-фит (PF); Резьбовая (ISO); ZeroStack / полуинтегрированная (ZS); Другое